Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 6. Alaska Technical and Vocational Education.

Sec. 23.15.820.
Powers and duties of the Alaska Workforce Investment Board.

The Alaska Workforce Investment Board shall

administer the Alaska technical and vocational education program established in AS

23.15.820

—

23.15.850

;

facilitate the development of a statewide policy for a coordinated and effective technical and vocational education training system in this state and, to the extent authorized by federal and state law, plan and coordinate federal, state, and local efforts in technical and vocational education programs;

adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to carry out the purposes of AS

23.15.820

—

23.15.850

, including regulations that set standards for the percentage of a grant that may be used for administrative costs; the regulations must clearly identify and distinguish between expenses that may be included in administrative costs and those that may not be included in administrative costs; the percentage allowed for administrative costs may not exceed the lesser of five percent or the amount permitted under the requirements of a federal program, if applicable;

administer the grant program under AS

23.15.840

and establish grant administration requirements including accounting procedures that apply to qualified entities and their grantees;

facilitate the development and implementation of a statewide policy and procedure that provides for the acceptance of credit or hours toward a degree or technical program offered by a vocational or technical training center in the state for an applicant who provides satisfactory evidence of successful completion of relevant military education, training, or service as a member of the armed forces of the United States, the United States Reserves, the National Guard of any state, the Military Reserves of any state, or the Naval Militia of any state.

The board may

receive money designated for technical and vocational education programs and may disburse money, including grants, to technical and vocational education projects in accordance with AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act);

enter into partnership agreements through appropriate administrative agencies with private industry training entities within the state in order to facilitate the coordination of training opportunities; and

recommend to the legislature changes to enhance the effectiveness of the training programs it oversees under this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 132 SLA 2000; am § 33 ch 86 SLA 2002; am § 4 ch 28 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For Alaska Workforce Investment Board, see AS

23.15.550

.

Administrative Code. —

For state technical and vocational education program, see 8 AAC 86.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective December 31, 2013, added (a)(5), and made a related change.

Sec. 23.15.830.
Alaska technical and vocational education program account.

The Alaska technical and vocational education program account is established in the general fund. The commissioner of administration shall separately account for money collected under AS

23.15.835

that the department deposits in the general fund. The legislature may appropriate the annual estimated balance in the account to the board to implement AS

23.15.820

—

23.15.850

. The legislature may appropriate the lapsing balance of the account to the unemployment compensation fund established in AS

23.20.130

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 132 SLA 2000; am § 34 ch 86 SLA 2002)

Sec. 23.15.835.
Special employee unemployment contributions for program.

In the manner provided in AS 23.20 and for the benefit of the program, the department shall collect from each employee an amount equal to .16 percent of the wages, as set out in AS

23.20.175

, on which the employee is required to make contributions under AS

23.20.290(d)

. The department shall remit to the Department of Revenue, in accordance with AS

37.10.050

, money collected under this subsection.

Notwithstanding AS

23.20.290(d)

, the department shall credit each employee with an amount equal to the amount collected from the employee under (a) of this section against unemployment contributions owed by the employee under AS 23.20.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall assess and collect, under AS

23.20.185

—

23.20.275

, interest and penalties for delinquent reports and payments due under this section. Interest and penalties collected shall be handled in accordance with AS

23.20.130(d)

.

Notwithstanding AS

23.15.840(a)

, for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2015, through June 30, 2024, the money collected under this section or otherwise appropriated to the Alaska Workforce Investment Board shall be allocated directly in the following percentages to the following institutions for programs consistent with AS

23.15.820

—

23.15.850

and capital improvements:

The institutions receiving funding under (d) of this section shall provide an expenditure and performance report to the department by November 1 of each year that includes

the percentage of former participants in the program who have jobs one year after leaving the program;

the median wage of former participants seven to 12 months after leaving the program;

the percentage of former participants who were employed after leaving the program who received training under the program that was related or somewhat related to the former participants’ jobs seven to 12 months after leaving the program;

a description of each vocational education course funded through the allocation set out in (d) of this section that permits high school students to earn dual credit upon course completion, and the number of high school students who earned dual credit in the past year;

a copy of any articulation agreement established under (g) of this section that either was in effect for the preceding year or is in process for the next year of funding, and the number of high school students who earned dual credit under each articulation agreement; and

the performance and financial information needed to verify the performance of the program as specified by the department by regulation.

The department shall prepare and present an expenditure and performance report based on the information provided under (e) of this section to the legislature not later than the 15th day of each regular legislative session.

The institutions receiving funding under (d) of this section shall establish and maintain at least one articulation agreement under which dual credit may be earned by high school students upon completion of a vocational education course.

An institution’s failure to comply with (e) or (g) of this section shall result in a withholding penalty of 20 percent of the funding allocated under (d) of this section in the following year.

University of Alaska 45 percent Galena Interior Learning Academy 4 percent Alaska Technical Center 9 percent Alaska Vocational Technical Center 17 percent Northwestern Alaska Career and Technical Center 3 percent Southwest Alaska Vocational and Education Center 3 percent Yuut Elitnaurviat, Inc. People’s Learning Center 9 percent Partners for Progress in Delta, Inc. 3 percent Amundsen Educational Center 2 percent Ilisagvik College 5 percent.

Click to view

History.

(§ 3 ch 132 SLA 2000; am §§ 1, 2 ch 47 SLA 2008; am §§ 30 — 33 ch 15 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 2017; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 2020; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 15, SLA 2014, see 2014 House Journal 1434 — 1437.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (a), substituted “.16 percent” for “.15 percent” following “in an amount equal to”, effective May 14, 2014, in the introductory language in (d), substituted “June 30, 2015” for “June 30, 2009” and “June 30, 2017” for “June 30, 2014”; in the list of institutions, deleted “University of Alaska Southeast 5 percent”, substituted “Galena Interior Learning Academy” for “Galena Project Education Vocational Training Center”, substituted “Alaska Technical Center” for “Kotzebue Technical Center”, substituted “Partners for Progress in Delta, Inc.” for “Delta Career Advancement Center”, substituted “Amundsen Educational Center” for “New Frontier Vocational Technical Center” and added “Ilisagvik College 5 percent”; effective July 1, 2015, in (e), added (e)(4) — (e)(6) and deleted former (e)(4) and (e)(5) related to satisfaction of participants and employers with the program; added (g) and (h), and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment, effective June 30, 2017, in (d), substituted “June 30, 2020” for “June 30, 2017” and deleted “, formerly known as the Alaska Human Resource Investment Council,” following “Alaska Workforce Investment Board”.

The 2020 amendment, effective April 21, 2020, in (d), substituted “June 30, 2021” for “June 30, 2020”.

The 2021 amendment, effective June 10, 2021, in (d), in the introductory language, substituted “June 30, 2024” for “June 30, 2021”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 24, SLA 2017 provides that the 2017 amendment to subsection (d) “is retroactive to June 30, 2017.”

Sec. 23.15.840.
Grants for technical and vocational education.

The board shall award grants, in accordance with the priority list adopted under (f) of this section, to technical and vocational education entities. A technical and vocational education entity is eligible for a grant under this section if the entity meets program requirements, the grant program is physically located in Alaska, and the entity can demonstrate that

the entity’s accounting systems include controls adequate to check the accuracy and reliability of accounting data, promote operating efficiency, and assure compliance with program requirements and generally accepted accounting principles;

the entity’s activities do not replace or compete in any way with a federally approved apprenticeship program or any other existing training programs; and

the entity has secured matching funds for the program for which the grant is requested.

The board may not award a grant if the grant would displace money available through existing public or private technical and vocational education programs.

Subject to the limits of its grant, an entity receiving a grant under this section shall provide one or more program elements. The program elements include

industry-specific training;

on-the-job training; and

institutional or classroom job-linked training.

A technical or vocational educational institution that receives a grant from the board shall give appropriate state agencies full access to accounting records concerning the grant to assure compliance with program standards.

In making a grant under this section, the board shall require that the qualified entity and grantees of the qualified entity limit the amount of the grant proceeds spent on administration so that the total spent on administration from the proceeds of the technical and vocational education program account, including amounts spent by the board itself, does not exceed five percent. A training program funded by the board must

meet the standards adopted by the board concerning the percentage of a grant that may be spent on administrative costs;

be operated by an institution that holds a valid authorization to operate issued under AS 14.48 if the program is a postsecondary educational program operated by a postsecondary educational institution subject to regulation under AS 14.48.

To the extent that funding is available, grants shall be awarded to entities that apply for funding by the deadline established by the board by regulation. The board shall give priority to grant applications from qualified entities whose purpose is listed first on the list of priorities adopted under this subsection. If money remains after grants for the first priority have been awarded, the board may make grants to entities whose purpose is listed next on the list of priorities. The board shall proceed in this fashion until it has exhausted the money available for granting for the year. The board shall adopt a priority list each year based on economic, employment, and other relevant data in order to maximize employment opportunities for participants.

History.

(§ 3 ch 132 SLA 2000; am §§ 35 — 39 ch 86 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For state technical and vocational education program, see 8 AAC 86.

Sec. 23.15.850.
Definitions.

In AS

23.15.820

—

23.15.850

,

“articulation agreement” means a dual-credit partnership between a school district and an institution receiving funding under AS

23.15.835(d)

that describes vocational education courses, student eligibility, course location, academic policies, student support services, credit on a student’s transcript, funding, and other items required by the partnering institutions;

“board” means the Alaska Workforce Investment Board;

“dual credit” means simultaneous high school credit and credit toward a career or vocational certification.

“program” means the Alaska technical and vocational education program established in AS

23.15.820

—

23.15.850

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 132 SLA 2000; am § 40 ch 86 SLA 2002; am § 34 ch 15 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraphs (1) and (3) were enacted as (3) and (4), and renumbered in 2014.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, added paragraph (3) and (4) [now (1) and (3), respectively].